New York, session 2025-2026, S9835.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 12 of section 66 of the public service law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph (n) to read as follows: 3 (n) In addition to any other requirements imposed by this section, 4 regarding an increase in rates or charges, as such terms are used in 5 paragraph (c) of this subdivision, the commission shall require all gas 6 and electric corporations to provide at least thirty days' notice, in 7 writing, to each customer which such service is being provided to, indi- 8 cating to such customer that a rate or charge increase for services will 9 take effect. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01894-08-6